Missouri, session 2026, HB2314.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 213.077 and 213.111, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 213.064, 213.077, and 213.111, to read as
follows:
213.064. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Changing room", a room that is designated for a person to change his or
her clothes or to shower;
(2) "Family restroom", a single-stall restroom that is enclosed by floor-to-ceiling
walls, that is accessed by a full door with a secure lock that prevents another person
from entering while the restroom is in use, and that complies with the standards of the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.;
(3) "Restroom", a room that contains one or more toilets or urinals;
(4) "Sex", the physical condition of being male or female based on genetics and
physiology, as identified on the person's original birth certificate.
2. It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for a place of public
accommodation to:
(1) Designate any changing room or any restroom, other than a family restroom,
for use by persons of both sexes; or
(2) Allow any person to use a changing room or restroom that has been
designated for use exclusively by persons of the opposite sex.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2314 2
3. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a place or
business that collects membership fees or dues from persons for access to any of the
accommodations, advantages, facilities, services, or privileges made available in the
place or business shall not be exempt from the provisions of this section on the basis of
the collection of such fees or dues, and shall be deemed a "place of public
accommodation" under this section, as long as the place or business accepts for
membership any member of the public who pays the fees or dues and the place or
business otherwise meets the definition of a place of public accommodation in section
213.010.
213.077. 1. During the period beginning with the filing of a complaint under section
213.075, and ending with the filing of a charge, setting of a complaint for hearing or dismissal
of a complaint pursuant to the provisions of that section, the executive director and the
commission staff shall, to the extent feasible, engage in settlement and/or conciliation with
respect to the complaint. Any settlement and conciliation agreement negotiated during such
period shall be an agreement between the complainant and respondent and shall be subject to
approval by the executive director. Nothing said or done in the course of settlement or
conciliation under this section shall be made public or used as evidence in any subsequent
proceeding under this chapter, without the written consent of the complainant and respondent.
2. If a complaint has been filed pursuant to section 213.055, 213.064, 213.065, or
213.070, alleging commission of an unlawful employment practice or discrimination in
public accommodations:
(1) During investigation, the public shall not have access to records relating to the
complaint, nor shall any information relating thereto be released to the public;
(2) During investigation, the complainant and respondent shall only have access to
records they provided until the point at which disclosure is allowed at hearing, or if a request
for civil action is made under section 213.111 for a right to or other legal proceedings
pursuant to federal, state or local discrimination laws that require disclosure;
(3) Settlement agreements, executed during investigation shall be disclosed to the
public only by agreement of the complainant and respondent;
(4) After closure of a complaint, the public may only have access to the complaint
and closure documents by agreement of the complainant and respondent;
(5) Excluding a finding of probable cause, after an investigation closure, the
complainant and respondent may have access to the investigative file except for sensitive or
confidential records and records relating to witnesses who have requested anonymity. With
respect to records that the commission has obtained from other government agencies, the
commission will observe any statutory confidentiality provisions imposed on the originating
agencies;

HB 2314 3
(6) A conciliation agreement shall be disclosed to the public only by agreement of the
complainant and respondent;
(7) After failure of conciliation attempts, the complainant and respondent may have
access to copies of the investigative file, except for sensitive or confidential records and
records relating to witnesses who have requested anonymity;
(8) To achieve the purposes of this chapter, this subsection shall not apply to
disclosure of information to representatives of interested federal, state or local civil or human
rights agencies.
3. If a complaint is filed alleging violation of section 213.040, 213.045, 213.050, or
213.070, to the extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves
violations of one or more of the other above enumerated sections or relates to or involves the
encouraging, aiding or abetting of violation of such sections:
(1) The public, complainant and respondent shall have access to records relating to
the complaint in the same manner as set forth in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (5), (7), and (8) of
subsection 2 of this section;
(2) Any settlement or conciliation agreement entered into by the complainant and
respondent shall be made public unless the parties thereto otherwise agree and the executive
director determines that disclosure is not required to further the purpose of this chapter.
213.111. 1. If, after one hundred eighty days from the filing of a complaint alleging
an unlawful discriminatory practice pursuant to section 213.055, 213.064, 213.065, or
213.070 to the extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves a
violation of section 213.055, 213.064, or 213.065, or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of
section 213.070 as it relates to employment and public accommodations, the commission has
not completed its administrative processing and the person aggrieved so requests in writing,
the commission shall issue to the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or her
right to bring a civil action within ninety days of such notice against the respondent named in
the complaint. If, after the filing of a complaint pursuant to sections 213.040, 213.045,
213.050 and 213.070, to the extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or
involves a violation of sections 213.040, 213.045 and 213.050, or subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of section 213.070 as it relates to housing, and the person aggrieved so requests
in writing, the commission shall issue to the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter
indicating his or her right to bring a civil action within ninety days of such notice against the
respondent named in the complaint. The commission may not at any other time or for any
other reason issue a letter indicating a complainant's right to bring a civil action. Such an
action may be brought in any circuit court in any county in which the unlawful discriminatory
practice is alleged to have been committed, either before a circuit or associate circuit judge.
Upon issuance of this notice, the commission shall terminate all proceedings relating to the

HB 2314 4
complaint. No person may file or reinstate a complaint with the commission after the
issuance of a notice under this section relating to the same practice or act. Any action brought
in court under this section shall be filed within ninety days from the date of the commission's
notification letter to the individual but no later than two years after the alleged cause occurred
or its reasonable discovery by the alleged injured party.
2. The court may grant as relief, as it deems appropriate, any permanent or temporary
injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order, and may award to the plaintiff actual
and punitive damages, and may award court costs and reasonable attorney fees to the
prevailing party, other than a state agency or commission or a local commission; except that, a
prevailing respondent may be awarded reasonable attorney fees only upon a showing that the
case was without foundation.
3. Any party to any action initiated under this section has a right to a trial by jury.
4. The sum of the amount of actual damages, including damages for future pecuniary
losses, emotional pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment of life,
and other nonpecuniary losses, and punitive damages awarded under this section shall not
exceed for each complaining party:
(1) Actual back pay and interest on back pay; and
(2) (a) In the case of a respondent who has more than five and fewer than one
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, fifty thousand dollars;
(b) In the case of a respondent who has more than one hundred and fewer than two
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, one hundred thousand dollars;
(c) In the case of a respondent who has more than two hundred and fewer than five
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, two hundred thousand dollars; or
(d) In the case of a respondent who has more than five hundred employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, five hundred
thousand dollars.
5. In any employment-related civil action brought under this chapter, the plaintiff
shall bear the burden of proving the alleged unlawful decision or action was made or taken
because of his or her protected classification and was the direct proximate cause of the
claimed damages.
✔